Utah statutes.
31A-34-103.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Alliance," "health insurance purchasing alliance," or "health insurance purchasing co-operative" means a nonrisk bearing nonprofit corporation or trust which makes health insurance available to its members and enrollees from multiple unaffiliated insurers through the use of coordinated actuarial models, coordinated underwriting, or coordinated marketing methodologies.

(2)  "Board" means a health insurance purchasing alliance's board of directors or trustees.

(3)  "Contracted insurer" means an insurer that contracts with a health insurance purchasing alliance to provide coverage to enrollees under a health benefit plan.

(4)  "Enrollee" means an individual who is covered in a health benefit plan made available through a health insurance purchasing alliance and offered by a contracted insurer.

(5)  "Health insurance purchasing association" means a nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to Section 31A-34-105 by employers for the purpose of jointly purchasing health insurance.

(6)  "Member" means a person who purchases health insurance through a health insurance purchasing alliance.

